Tennessee, session 114, HB0953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "School Safety and Mental
Health Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 2, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Each LEA and public charter school shall employ at least one (1) full-time
licensed professional school counselor for each school in the LEA or public charter
school.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4302, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
( )
(1) The Tennessee school safety center shall administer a school safety
infrastructure grant program. The center shall develop a school safety
infrastructure grant application that requires LEAs to describe, at a minimum,
how grant funds:
(A) Will be used to improve and support school safety
infrastructure;
(B) Align with the needs identified in a school security
assessment conducted pursuant to subsection (f); and
HB0953
001139
- 1 -

(C) Will be used to support LEA-authorized charter schools, if
applicable.
(2) In order to be eligible to receive grant funds, the LEA must be in
compliance with all state laws, rules, and regulations regarding school safety.
(3) Subject to appropriations, the Tennessee school safety center shall
award grants to LEAs that meet the requirements of this subsection ( ). Any
funds appropriated for this program in any fiscal year that are not expended must
be carried forward for program purposes in future fiscal years.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001139